Maryland, session 2026, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
3–106.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1210*

HOUSE BILL 1210
(a) If a person timely files, the person may apply to intervene in a proceeding
before the Commission.
(b) The Commission shall grant leave to intervene unless the Commission
concludes that:
(1) the parties to the proceeding adequately represent the interest of the
person seeking to intervene; or
(2) the issues that the person seeks to raise are irrelevant or immaterial.
(c) (1) An intervenor has all the rights of a party to a proceeding.
(2) In a proceeding before the Commission, an individual who is an
intervenor may represent himself or herself.
7–204.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, at least 30 days
before a hearing, a public service company shall provide to each owner of land and each
owner of adjacent land, by certified mail, written notice of intent to run a line or similar
transmission device over, on, or under the land.
(2) AT THE SAME TIME A PERSON APPLIES FOR A CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF ANY
TRANSMISSION LINE UNDER § 7–207 OR § 7–208 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERSON
SHALL PROVIDE, BY CERTIFIED MAIL, NOTICE OF INTENT TO RUN A LINE OR SIMILAR
TRANSMISSION DEVICE OVER, ON, OR UNDER THE LAND TO:
(I) EACH OWNER OF LAND THAT ABUTS THE PROPERTY WHERE
THE CONSTRUCTION IS PLANNED; AND
(II) FOR CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION
LINE, EACH OWNER OF LAND AND EACH OWNER OF ADJACENT LAND.
(3) NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ADVISE THE
RECIPIENT OF:
(I) ANY APPLICABLE RIGHT TO FILE AS AN INTERVENOR IN THE
PROCEEDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–106 OF THIS ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1210 3
(II) THE PROCESS FOR FILING AS AN INTERVENOR IN THE
PROCEEDING, INCLUDING THE METHOD FOR FILING AND THE LOCATION WHERE THE
FILING IS REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED;
(III) THE DATE AND TIME BY WHICH THE RECIPIENT IS
REQUIRED TO FILE AS AN INTERVENOR IN ORDER TO BE CONSIDERED TIMELY; AND
(IV) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE COMMISSION AND THE
WEBSITE WHERE THE RECIPIENT MAY OBTAIN ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
REGARDING INTERVENTION RIGHTS AND PROCEDURES.
[(2)] (C) The public service company shall determine the property owners
from the current tax assessment records of the political subdivision in which the property
is located.
[(b) Unless the failure is willful or deliberate, the failure of a public service
company to provide notice does not invalidate a public hearing or require that another
hearing take place.]
(D) FAILURE TO PROVIDE NOTICE UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) INVALIDATES A PUBLIC HEARING AND REQUIRES THAT ANOTHER
HEARING TAKE PLACE; OR
(2) IF THE REQUIRED NOTICE IS REGARDING AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY, VOIDS THE APPLICATION
FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY.
(E) A PERSON WHOSE APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY IS VOIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION
MAY REAPPLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.